California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(2) If the total electricity delivered to the site by Pacific Gas and Electric Company since the previous true-up is less than the total electricity exported to the grid by the HHWP at-site renewable generation facility at the site, the City and County of San Francisco is a net electricity producer at that site. For any HHWP at-site renewable generation site where the City and County of San Francisco is a net electricity producer, the City and County of San Francisco shall receive no credit or offset for the electricity exported to the grid in excess of the electricity delivered to the site from the grid. For any site where the City and County of San Francisco
 is a net electricity producer, the City and County of San Francisco shall receive a credit or offset up to the amount of electricity delivered to the site from the grid. The credit or offset shall be applied to reduce the obligations of the City and County of San Francisco to an invoice prepared pursuant to the Interconnection Agreement. If there is no invoiced obligation to be reduced, there is no applicable credit or offset. Pacific Gas and Electric Company shall use the last-in, first-out method to determine what electricity delivered to the grid from the site will not earn a credit or offset.

(e) Pursuant to this section, the offset to charges under the Interconnection Agreement is the medium to convey credits earned under this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect in any way the rights and obligations of the City and County of San Francisco and Pacific Gas and Electric Company under the Interconnection Agreement. If
 the Interconnection Agreement terminates, the City and County of San Francisco and Pacific Gas and Electric Company shall develop an alternative mechanism to convey credits earned under this section for HHWP at-site renewable generation and for HHWP remote renewable generation, in a manner that accomplishes the same result as that accomplished pursuant to the Interconnection Agreement.

(f) (1) Pacific Gas and Electric Company shall file an advice letter with the commission, that complies with this section, not later than 10 days after the City and County of San Francisco first designates the specific renewable electricity generation facilities that will comprise HHWP at-site renewable generation.

(2) The commission, within 30 days of the date of filing of the advice letter, shall approve the advice letter or specify conforming changes to be made by Pacific
 Gas and Electric Company to be filed in an amended advice letter within 30 days.

(g) The City and County of San Francisco may terminate its election pursuant to subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (h), upon providing Pacific Gas and Electric Company with a minimum of 60 days’ written notice.

(h) (1) The City and County of San Francisco may elect to designate specific renewable electricity generation facilities or a portion of specific renewable electricity generation facilities as HHWP remote renewable generation and may use HHWP remote renewable generation to supply electricity to specific facilities designated as qualifying remote load up to the amount of electricity being used by the qualifying remote load.

(2) The City and County of San Francisco shall receive no credit or offset for the
 electricity exported to the grid from HHWP remote renewable generation, in excess of the electricity delivered from the grid to qualifying remote load.

(3) Pacific Gas and Electric Company shall accept any electricity exported to the grid as HHWP remote renewable generation, up to the amount of electricity being used during the corresponding time period by the qualifying remote load, and treat the electricity accepted as behind the meter generation that offsets the electrical usage of qualifying remote load. Additional rates may apply pursuant to paragraph (6).

(4) The City and County of San Francisco shall be responsible for scheduling the electricity exported to the grid from HHWP remote renewable generation.

(5) Both HHWP remote renewable generation sites and qualifying remote load sites shall have meters capable
 of measuring exports and usage of electricity that will support determination of credits or offsets pursuant to paragraph (2). The City and County of San Francisco shall be responsible for the costs of the meters required pursuant to this section.

(6) To compensate Pacific Gas and Electric Company for the use of its facilities, the City and County of San Francisco shall pay applicable distribution rates, transmission rates, or distribution and transmission rates, at rate levels determined by the Interconnection Agreement, for all energy delivered to qualifying remote load that comes from HHWP remote renewable generation. When HHWP remote renewable generation and the qualifying remote load it serves are located within the City and County of San Francisco and are interconnected at distribution voltage, the applicable rate for delivery of energy from HHWP remote renewable generation shall be reduced as negotiated pursuant to the Interconnection
 Agreement.

(7) The appropriate regulatory agency shall ensure that the delivery of electricity by HHWP remote renewable generation to qualifying remote load, and the granting of offsets to the City and County of San Francisco pursuant to this subdivision, do not result in a shifting of costs to bundled service customers, either immediately or over time.

(i) Hetch Hetchy Water and Power shall reimburse Pacific Gas and Electric Company for its reasonable study costs associated with HHWP remote and at-site renewable generation to address interconnection, consistent with applicable regulatory rules, and impacts upon the electric system resulting from the HHWP remote and at-site renewable generation. If the studies identify improvements necessary for the protection of the Pacific Gas and Electric Company electric system, for the protection of its employees, or to ensure reliable
 delivery of the electricity generated by the HHWP remote and at-site renewable generation facility to qualifying remote load, Hetch Hetchy Water and Power shall pay the reasonable costs of the improvements if it elects to designate the HHWP remote and at-site renewable generation facility to provide electricity for qualifying remote load.

(j) The interconnection of HHWP at-site renewable generation and HHWP remote renewable generation will be accomplished through one or more generator interconnection agreements pursuant to applicable regulatory rules and generator interconnection procedures.

(k) The City and County of San Francisco shall own the environmental attributes associated with the electricity delivered to the electric grid by HHWP at-site renewable generation and HHWP remote renewable generation unless it contracts otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 598, Sec. 1.   (SB 581)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2829.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “EBMUD” means the East Bay Municipal Utility District organized and operating pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 11501).

(2) “Environmental attributes” associated with the generation of electricity include the credits, benefits, emissions reductions, environmental air quality credits, and emissions reduction
 credits, offsets, and allowances, however entitled, resulting from the avoidance of the emissions of any gas, chemical, or other substance attributable to an electricity generation facility.

(b) To ensure that no electrical corporation operates its monopoly transmission and distribution system in a manner that impedes the ability of the EBMUD to reduce its electricity costs through the delivery of electricity generated by EBMUD, an electrical corporation shall meet the requirements of this section.

(c) An electrical corporation that owns and operates transmission and distribution facilities that deliver electricity at one or more locations to the EBMUD’s system shall, upon request by EBMUD, and without discrimination or delay, use the same facilities to deliver electricity generated by EBMUD. EBMUD may elect to designate specific hydroelectric generation facilities owned by EBMUD
 for the generation of electricity to be delivered to EBMUD, if the following conditions are met:

(1) The amount of all electricity delivered to the electric grid by the designated EBMUD hydroelectric generation is the property of EBMUD.

(2) Ownership and use of the environmental attributes associated with the electricity delivered to the electric grid by EBMUD-designated hydroelectric generation is retained by EBMUD.

(d) (1) No rule, order, or tariff of the commission implementing direct transactions is applicable to electricity generated by EBMUD, that is delivered to EBMUD for its own use that is transported over the transmission and distribution system of an electrical corporation, pursuant to an election made by EBMUD pursuant to subdivision (c).

(2) Sections 365 and 366 are not applicable to electricity generated by EBMUD, that is delivered to EBMUD for its own use that is transported over the transmission and distribution system of an electrical corporation, pursuant to an election made by EBMUD pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) To compensate an electrical corporation for the use of its facilities, EBMUD shall pay applicable rates approved by the commission for distribution, or distribution and transmission, or any transmission rates as required under federal law.

(f) On or before January 1, 2009, each electrical corporation that owns and operates transmission and distribution facilities that deliver electricity at one or more locations to the EBMUD system shall file an advice letter with the commission that complies with this section. The commission, within 150
 days of the date of filing of the advice letter, shall approve the advice letter or specify conforming changes to be made by the electrical corporation, to be filed in an amended advice letter within 60 days.

(g) The commission shall ensure that the delivery of electricity from EBMUD-designated hydroelectric generation to the EBMUD service territory pursuant to this section does not result in a shifting of costs to the bundled service customers of an electrical corporation, either immediately or over time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 196.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.5. Local Government Renewable Energy Self-Generation Program [2830. - 2830.]

2830.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Benefiting account” means an electricity account, or more than one account, that satisfies any of the following:

(A) The account or accounts are located within the geographical boundaries of a local government or, for a campus, within the geographical boundary of the city, county, or city and county in which the campus is located, with the account or accounts being mutually agreed upon by the local government or campus and an electrical corporation.

(B) The account or accounts
 belong to members of a joint powers authority and are located within the geographical boundaries of the group of public agencies that formed the joint powers authority, if the eligible renewable generating facility and electricity account or accounts are wholly located within a single county within which the joint powers authority is located and electric service is provided by a single electrical corporation, with the account or accounts being mutually agreed upon by the joint powers authority and the electrical corporation.

(C) The account or accounts belong to a tribe and are located on land owned by or under the jurisdiction of the tribe, if the eligible renewable generating facility and electricity account or accounts are wholly located within a single county within which the tribe is located and electrical service is provided by a single electrical
 corporation, with the account or accounts being mutually agreed upon by the tribe and the electrical corporation.

(2) “Bill credit” means an amount of money credited to a benefiting account that is calculated based upon the time-of-use electricity generation component of the electricity usage charge of the generating account, multiplied by the quantities of electricity generated by an eligible renewable generating facility that are exported to the grid during the corresponding time period. Electricity is exported to the grid if it is generated by an eligible renewable generating facility, is not utilized onsite by the local government, and the electricity flows through the meter site and on to the electrical corporation’s distribution or transmission infrastructure.

(3) “Campus”
 means an individual community college campus, individual California State University campus, or individual University of California campus.

(4) “Eligible renewable generating facility” means a generation facility that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Has a generating capacity of no more than five megawatts.

(B) Is an eligible renewable energy resource, as defined in Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Part 1.

(C) Is located within the geographical boundary of the local government or, for a campus, within the geographical boundary of the city or city and county, if the campus is located in an incorporated area, or county, if the campus is
 located in an unincorporated area or, for a tribe, on land owned by or under the jurisdiction of the tribe.

(D) Is owned by, operated by, or on property under the control of the local government, campus, or tribe.

(E) Is sized to offset all or part of the electrical load of the benefiting account. For these purposes, premises that are leased by a local government, campus, or tribe are under the control of the local government, campus, or tribe.

(5) “Generating account” means the time-of-use electric service account of the local government or campus where the eligible renewable generating facility is located.

(6) “Local government” means a city, county, whether
 general law or chartered, city and county, special district, school district, political subdivision, other local public agency, or a joint powers authority formed pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code) that has as members public agencies located within the same county and same electrical corporation service territory, but shall not mean the state, any agency or department of the state, other than an individual campus of the University of California or the California State University, or any joint powers authority that has as members public agencies located in different counties or different electrical corporation service territories, or that has as a member the federal government, any federal department or agency, this or another state, or any department or agency of this state or another state.

(7) “Tribe” means a California Native American tribe, as defined in Section 21073 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) Subject to the limitation in subdivision (h), a local government or tribe may elect to receive electric service pursuant to this section if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The local government or tribe designates one or more benefiting accounts to receive a bill credit.

(2) A benefiting account receives service under a time-of-use rate schedule.

(3) The benefiting account is the responsibility of, and serves property that is owned, operated, or on property under the control of
 the same local government or tribe that owns, operates, or controls the eligible renewable generating facility.

(4) The electrical output of the eligible renewable generating facility is metered for time of use to allow calculation of the bill credit based upon when the electricity is exported to the grid.

(5) All costs associated with the metering requirements of paragraphs (2) and (4) are the responsibility of the local
 government or tribe, or its members.

(6) All costs associated with interconnection are the responsibility of the local government or tribe, or its members. For purposes of this paragraph, “interconnection” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2803, except that it applies to the interconnection of an eligible renewable generating facility rather than the energy source of a private energy producer.

(7) The local government or tribe does not sell electricity exported to the electrical grid to a third party.

(8) All electricity exported to the grid by the local government or tribe that is generated by the eligible renewable generating facility becomes the property of the electrical corporation to which the
 facility is interconnected, but shall not be counted toward the electrical corporation’s total retail sales for purposes of Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1. Ownership of the renewable energy credits, as defined in Section 399.12, shall be the same as the ownership of the renewable energy credits associated with electricity that is net metered pursuant to Section 2827.

(9) An electrical corporation shall not be required to compensate a local government or tribe for electricity generated from an eligible renewable facility pursuant to this section in excess of the bill credits applied to the designated benefiting account. A local government renewable
 generation facility participating pursuant to this section shall not be eligible for any other tariff or program that requires an electrical corporation to purchase generation from that facility while participating in the local government renewable energy self-generation program pursuant to this section.

(c) The following billing and crediting procedures will apply to a local government or tribe electing to receive electric service pursuant to this chapter:

(1) A benefiting account shall be billed for all electricity usage, and for each bill component, at the rate schedule applicable to the benefiting account, including any cost-responsibility surcharge or other cost recovery mechanism, as determined by the commission, to reimburse the Department of
 Water Resources for purchases of electricity, pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code.

(2) The bill shall then subtract the bill credit applicable to the benefiting account. The generation component credited to the benefiting account shall not include the cost-responsibility surcharge or other cost recovery mechanism, as determined by the commission, to reimburse the Department of Water Resources for purchases of electricity, pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code. The electrical corporation shall ensure that the local government receives the full bill credit.

(3) If, during the billing cycle, the generation component of the electricity usage charges exceeds the bill credit, the benefiting account shall be billed
 for the difference.

(4) If, during the billing cycle, the bill credit applied pursuant to paragraph (2) exceeds the generation component of the electricity usage charges, the difference shall be carried forward as a financial credit to the next billing cycle.

(5) After the electricity usage charge pursuant to paragraph (1) and the credit pursuant to paragraph (2) are determined for the last billing cycle of a 12-month period, any remaining credit resulting from the application of this section shall be reset to zero.

(d) The commission shall ensure that the transfer of a bill credit to a benefiting account does not result in a shifting of costs to bundled service subscribers. The costs associated with the transfer of
 a bill credit shall include all billing-related expenses.

(e) Not more frequently than once per year, and upon providing the electrical corporation with a minimum of 60 days’ notice, the participating local government or tribe may elect to change a benefiting account. Any credit resulting from the application of this section earned prior to the change in a benefiting account that has not been used as of the date of the change in the benefiting account shall be applied, and may only be applied, to a benefiting account as changed.

(f) A participating local government or tribe shall provide the electrical corporation to which the eligible renewable generating facility will be interconnected with not less than 60 days’ notice prior to the eligible renewable generating facility becoming operational.
 The electrical corporation shall file an advice letter with the commission that complies with this section not later than 30 days after receipt of the notice proposing a rate tariff for a benefiting account. The commission, within 30 days of the date of filing, shall approve the proposed tariff or specify conforming changes to be made by the electrical corporation to be filed in a new advice letter.

(g) The local government or tribe may terminate its election pursuant to subdivision (b), upon providing the electrical corporation with a minimum of 60 days’ notice. If the local government or tribe sells its interest in the eligible renewable generating facility, or sells the electricity generated by the eligible renewable generating facility, in a manner other than required by this section, upon the date of either event, and the earliest date if both
 events occur, no further bill credit pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) may be earned. Only credit earned prior to that date shall be made to a benefiting account.

(h) An electrical corporation is not obligated to provide a bill credit to a benefiting account that is not designated by a local government prior to the point in time that the combined statewide cumulative rated generating capacity of all eligible renewable generating facilities within the service territories of the state’s three largest electrical corporations reaches 250 megawatts. Only those eligible renewable generating facilities that are providing bill credits to benefiting accounts pursuant to this section shall count toward reaching this 250-megawatt limitation. Each electrical corporation shall only be required to offer service or contracts under this section
 until that electrical corporation reaches its proportionate share of the 250-megawatt limitation based on the ratio of its peak demand to the total statewide peak demand of all electrical corporations.

(i) This chapter does not apply to an electrical corporation with 60,000 or fewer customer accounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 141, Sec. 1.   (SB 479)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.6. Green Tariff Shared Renewables Program [2831. - 2833.]

2831.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Building operational generating facilities that utilize sources of renewable energy within California, to supply the state’s demand for electricity, provides significant financial, health, environmental, and workforce benefits to the State of California.

(b) The California Solar
 Initiative will achieve its goals, resulting in over 150,000 residential and commercial onsite installations of solar energy systems. However, the California Solar Initiative cannot reach all residents and businesses that want to participate and is limited to only solar energy systems and not other eligible renewable energy resources. A green tariff shared renewables program seeks to build on the success of the California Solar Initiative by expanding access to all eligible renewable energy resources to all ratepayers who are currently unable to access the benefits of onsite generation.

(c) There is widespread interest from many large institutional customers, including schools, colleges, universities, local governments, businesses, and the military, for the development of generation facilities that are eligible renewable energy resources to serve more than 33 percent of their energy needs.

(d) Public institutions will benefit from a green tariff shared renewables program’s enhanced flexibility to participate in shared generation facilities that are eligible renewable energy resources.

(e) Building operational generating facilities that are eligible renewable energy resources creates jobs, reduces emissions of greenhouse gases, and promotes energy independence.

(f) Many large energy users in California have pursued onsite electrical generation from eligible renewable energy resources, but cannot achieve their goals due to rooftop or land space limitations, or size limits on net energy metering. The enactment of this chapter will create a mechanism whereby institutional customers, such as military installations, universities, and local governments, as well as commercial customers and groups of individuals, can meet their needs with electrical generation
 from eligible renewable energy resources.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that a green tariff shared renewables program be implemented in such a manner that facilitates a large, sustainable market for offsite electrical generation from facilities that are eligible renewable energy resources, while fairly compensating electrical corporations for the services they provide, without affecting nonparticipating ratepayers.

(h) It is the further intent of the Legislature that a green tariff shared renewables program be implemented in a manner that ensures nonparticipating ratepayer indifference for the remaining bundled service, direct access, and community choice aggregation customers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 413, Sec. 1.   (SB 43)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2831.5.

(a) This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Green Tariff Shared Renewables Program.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Eligible renewable energy resource,” “renewable energy credit,” and “renewables portfolio standard” have the same meaning as those
 terms have for the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1).

(2) “Participating utility” means an electrical corporation with 100,000 or more customer accounts in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 413, Sec. 1.   (SB 43)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2832.

(a) On or before March 1, 2014, a participating utility shall file with the commission an application requesting approval of a green tariff shared renewables program to implement a program that the utility determines is consistent with the legislative findings and statements of intent of Section 2831. Nothing in this chapter limits an electrical corporation with less than 100,000 customer accounts in California from filing an application with
 the commission to administer a green tariff shared renewables program that is consistent with the legislative findings and statements of intent of Section 2831.

(b) On or before July 1, 2014, the commission shall issue a decision on the participating utility’s application for a green tariff shared renewables program, determining whether to approve or disapprove it, with or without modifications.

(c) After notice and an opportunity for public comment, the commission shall approve an application by a participating utility for a green tariff shared renewables program if the commission determines that the program is reasonable and consistent with the legislative findings and statements of intent of Section 2831.

(d) The requirements of this chapter shall not apply to an electrical corporation that, prior to May 1, 2013,
 filed an application with the commission to have a green tariff shared renewables program, or an equivalent program of whatever name, provided the commission approves the application with a determination that the program does not shift costs to nonparticipating customers and the application is consistent with this chapter. If the commission has approved a settlement agreement relative to parties contesting an application filed prior to May 1, 2013, the requirements of this section shall not apply if the commission, within a reasonable period of time, requires revisions to the previously approved settlement agreement that requires the program to be consistent with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 413, Sec. 1.   (SB 43)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2833.

(a) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), the commission shall require a green tariff shared renewables program to be administered by a participating utility in accordance with this section.

(2) On and after April 1, 2023, the commission may authorize through an advice letter a participating utility to terminate its green tariff shared renewables program.

(b) Generating facilities participating in a participating utility’s green tariff shared renewables program shall be eligible renewable energy resources with a nameplate rated generating capacity not exceeding 20 megawatts, except for those generating
 facilities reserved for location in areas identified by the California Environmental Protection Agency as the most impacted and disadvantaged communities pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), which shall not exceed one megawatt nameplate rated generating capacity.

(c) A participating utility shall use commission-approved tools and mechanisms to procure additional eligible renewable energy resources for its green tariff shared renewables program from electrical generation facilities that are in addition to those required by the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1). For purposes of this subdivision, “commission-approved tools and mechanisms” means those procurement methods approved by the commission for an electrical corporation to procure
 eligible renewable energy resources for purposes of meeting the procurement requirements of the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1).

(d) A participating utility shall permit customers within the service territory of the utility to purchase electricity pursuant to the tariff approved by the commission to implement the utility’s green tariff shared renewables program, until the utility meets its proportionate share of a statewide limitation of 600 megawatts of customer participation, measured by nameplate rated generating
 capacity, or the participating utility’s green tariff shared renewables program is terminated or suspended. The proportionate share shall be calculated based on the ratio of each participating utility’s retail sales to total retail sales of electricity by all participating utilities. The commission may place other restrictions on purchases under a green tariff shared renewables program, including restricting participation to a certain level of capacity each year. The following restrictions apply to the statewide 600 megawatt limitation:

(1) (A) One hundred megawatts shall be reserved for facilities that are no larger than one megawatt nameplate rated generating capacity and that are located in areas previously identified by the California Environmental Protection Agency as the most impacted and disadvantaged
 communities. These communities shall be identified by census tract, and shall be determined to be the most impacted 20 percent based on results from the best available cumulative impact screening methodology designed to identify each of the following:

(i) Areas disproportionately affected by environmental pollution and other hazards that can lead to negative public health effects, exposure, or environmental degradation.

(ii) Areas with socioeconomic vulnerability.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “previously identified” means identified before commencing construction of the facility.

(2) Not less than 100 megawatts shall be reserved for
 participation by residential class customers.

(3) Twenty megawatts shall be reserved for the City of Davis.

(e) To the extent possible, a participating utility shall seek to procure eligible renewable energy resources that are located in reasonable proximity to enrolled participants.

(f) A participating utility’s green tariff shared renewables program shall support diverse procurement and the goals of commission General Order 156.

(g) A participating utility’s green tariff shared renewables program shall not allow a customer to subscribe to more than 100 percent of the customer’s electricity demand.

(h) Except
 as authorized by this subdivision, a participating utility’s green tariff shared renewables program shall not allow a customer to subscribe to more than two megawatts of nameplate generating capacity. This limitation does not apply to a federal, state, or local government, school or school district, county office of education, the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California.

(i) A participating utility’s green tariff shared renewables program shall not allow any single entity or its affiliates or subsidiaries to subscribe to more than 20 percent of any single calendar year’s total cumulative rated generating capacity.

(j) To the extent possible, a participating utility shall actively market the utility’s green tariff shared renewables
 program to low-income and minority communities and customers.

(k) Participating customers shall receive bill credits for the generation of a participating eligible renewable energy resource using the class average retail generation cost as established in the participating utility’s approved tariff for the class to which the participating customer belongs, plus a renewables adjustment value representing the difference between the time-of-delivery profile of the eligible renewable energy resource used to serve the participating customer and the class average time-of-delivery profile and the resource adequacy value, if any, of the resource contained in the utility’s green tariff shared renewables program. The renewables adjustment value applicable to a time-of-delivery profile of an eligible renewable energy resource shall be determined according
 to rules adopted by the commission. For these purposes, “time-of-delivery profile” refers to the daily generating pattern of a participating eligible renewable energy resource over time, the value of which is determined by comparing the generating pattern of that participating eligible renewable energy resource to the demand for electricity over time and other generating resources available to serve that demand.

(l) Participating customers shall pay a renewable generation rate established by the commission, the administrative costs of the participating utility, and any other charges the commission determines are just and reasonable to fully cover the cost of procuring a green tariff shared renewables program’s resources to serve a participating customer’s needs.

(m) A
 participating customer’s rates shall be debited or credited with any other commission-approved costs or values applicable to the eligible renewable energy resources contained in a participating utility’s green tariff shared renewables program’s portfolio. These additional costs or values shall be applied to new customers when they initially subscribe after the cost or value has been approved by the commission.

(n) Participating customers shall pay all otherwise applicable charges without modification.

(o) A participating utility shall permit a participating customer to subscribe to the program and be provided with a nonbinding estimate of reasonably anticipated bill credits and bill charges, as determined by the commission, for a period of up to 20 years.

(p) A participating utility shall provide support for enhanced community renewables programs to facilitate development of eligible renewable energy resource projects located close to the source of demand.

(q) The commission shall ensure that charges and credits associated with a participating utility’s green tariff shared renewables program are set in a manner that ensures nonparticipant ratepayer indifference for the remaining bundled service, direct access, and community choice
 aggregation customers and ensures that no costs are shifted from participating customers to nonparticipating ratepayers.

(r) A participating utility shall track and account for all revenues and costs to ensure that the utility recovers the actual costs of the utility’s green tariff shared renewables program and that all costs and revenues are fully transparent and auditable.

(s) Any renewable energy credits associated with electricity procured
 by a participating utility for the utility’s green tariff shared renewables program and used by a participating customer shall be retired by the participating utility on behalf of the participating customer. Those renewable energy credits shall not be further sold, transferred, or otherwise monetized for any purpose. Any renewable energy credits associated with electricity procured by a participating utility for the green tariff shared renewables program, but not used by a participating customer, shall be counted toward meeting that participating utility’s renewables portfolio standard.

(t) A participating utility shall, in the event of participant customer attrition or other causes that reduce customer participation or electrical demand below generation levels, apply the excess generation from the eligible renewable energy resources procured
 through the utility’s green tariff shared renewables program to the utility’s renewable portfolio standard procurement obligations or bank the excess generation for future use to benefit all customers in accordance with the renewables portfolio standard banking and procurement rules approved by the commission.

(u) In calculating its procurement requirements to meet the requirements of the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1), a participating utility may exclude from total retail sales the kilowatthours generated by an eligible renewable energy resource that is credited to a participating customer pursuant to the utility’s green tariff shared renewables program, commencing with the point in time at which the generating facility achieves commercial
 operation.

(v) All renewable energy resources procured on behalf of participating customers in the participating utility’s green tariff shared renewables program shall comply with the State Air Resources Board’s Voluntary Renewable Electricity Program. California-eligible greenhouse gas allowances associated with these purchases shall be retired on behalf of participating customers as part of the board’s Voluntary Renewable Electricity Program.

(w) A participating utility shall provide a municipality with aggregated consumption data for participating customers within the municipality’s jurisdiction to allow for reporting on progress toward climate action goals by the municipality. A participating utility shall also publicly disclose, on a geographic basis, consumption data and
 reductions in emissions of greenhouse gases achieved by participating customers in the utility’s green tariff shared renewables program, on an aggregated basis consistent with privacy protections as specified in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 8380) of Division 4.1.

(x) This section does not prohibit or restrict a community choice aggregator from offering its own voluntary renewable energy programs to participating customers of the community choice aggregation.
